src/fst/test/older-gt-norm-yamls/V-II-pimamon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - pimamon - adsf : #  VII2on acc. Wolvengrey p. 394
  
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: pimamon
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: pimamonwa
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg: pimamoniyiw
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl: pimamoniyiwa

     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-pimamon, kîpimamon]
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-pimamonwa, kîpimamonwa]
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kî-pimamoniyiw, kîpimamoniyiw]
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kî-pimamoniyiwa, kîpimamoniyiwa]
     
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-pimamon, kapimamon]
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-pimamonwa, kapimamonwa]
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Def+4Sg: [ka-pimamoniyiw, kapimamoniyiw]
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Def+4Pl: [ka-pimamoniyiwa, kapimamoniyiwa]
     
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-pimamon, wîpimamon]
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-pimamonwa, wîpimamonwa]
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Int+4Sg: [wî-pimamoniyiw, wîpimamoniyiw]
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Int+4Pl: [wî-pimamoniyiwa, wîpimamoniyiwa]

     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-pimamok, êpimamok]
     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-pimamoki, êpimamoki]
     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-pimamoniyik, êpimamoniyik]
     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-pimamoniyiki, êpimamoniyiki]

     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-pimamok, êkîpimamok]
     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-pimamoki, êkîpimamoki]
     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Sg: [ê-kî-pimamoniyik, êkîpimamoniyik]
     pimamon+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [ê-kî-pimamoniyiki, êkîpimamoniyiki]

     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: pimamoki
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: pimamokwawi
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: pimamoniyiki
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: pimamoniyikwâwi
